Maryland, session 2026, SB0954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–219.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EFFECTIVE LOAD CARRYING CAPABILITY” OR “ELCC” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 7–1201 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCE” MEANS A GENERATING
FACILITY OR AN ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE THAT HAS A CAPACITY RATING EQUAL TO
OR GREATER THAN 20 MEGAWATTS AFTER ACCOUNTING FOR THE EFFECTIVE LOAD
CARRYING CAPABILITY.
(4) “PJM CAPACITY MARKET” MEANS THE CAPACITY MARKET OF
PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC, OR ANY SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION THAT
SERVICES THE PJM REGION.
(5) “PRICE STABILITY EVENT” MEANS A CLEARING PRICE IN THE
PJM CAPACITY MARKET THAT HAS EXCEEDED OR IS EXPECTED TO EXCEED THE
PROJECTED NET COST OF NEW ENERGY FOR A GENERATING FACILITY OWNED BY AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY.
(6) “RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION” MEANS GENERATION FROM
A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE OR A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE AS DEFINED IN §
7–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(7) “RESOURCE ADEQUACY” MEANS THE MEASURE OF WHETHER
TRANSMISSION LINES HAVE SUFFICIENT CAPACITY AND RESERVES TO RELIABLY
BALANCE ELECTRICITY SUPPLY AND DEMAND WITHIN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 954 3
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE ONE OR MORE ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO DEVELOP AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A RESOURCE ADEQUACY
PLAN IF THE COMMISSION MAKES A DETERMINATION THAT:
(I) THERE IS INSUFFICIENT RESOURCE ADEQUACY IN THE
STATE; OR
(II) A PRICE STABILITY EVENT HAS OCCURRED.
(2) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT THE RESOURCE
ADEQUACY PLAN TO THE COMMISSION WITHIN 270 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION
MAKES A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE, MODIFY, OR DENY EACH
RESOURCE ADEQUACY PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE COMMISSION MAKES A DETERMINATION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) A RESOURCE ADEQUACY PLAN:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S PLANS TO
INVEST IN, OPERATE, AND MAINTAIN GENERATING FACILITIES OR TRANSMISSION
FACILITIES NECESSARY TO INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING FACILITIES WITH THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM IN ORDER TO ADDRESS THE RESOURCE ADEQUACY
INSUFFICIENCIES OR PRICE STABILITY EVENT IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION;
(II) SHALL PRIORITIZE THE DEVELOPMENT OR OPERATION OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES; AND
(III) MAY INCLUDE PLANS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF
RENEWABLE ENERGY GENERATION AND LARGE CAPACITY ENERGY RESOURCES.
7–219.2.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN INVESTOR–OWNED
ELECTRIC COMPANY REQUIRED OR AUTHORIZED TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OWN,
OR LEASE AND OPERATE ITS OWN GENERATING FACILITIES UNDER § 7–510 OF THIS
TITLE MAY RECOVER ALL OF THE PRUDENTLY INCURRED AND VERIFIABLE COSTS
INCURRED BY THE INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY IN CONSTRUCTING,
ACQUIRING, OWNING, OR LEASING AND OPERATING THE GENERATING FACILITIES
PLUS A REASONABLE RETURN.

SENATE BILL 954
(B) PRUDENTLY INCURRED COSTS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION INCLUDE:
(1) COSTS OF ACQUISITION, DESIGN, SITING, PERMITTING,
CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE, TAXES, FUEL, LABOR, CASH WORKING
CAPITAL, AND OTHER CARRYING COSTS; AND
(2) ANY EXPENSES OR COSTS OF INVESTMENTS THAT BECOME
STRANDED FOR ANY REASON.
(C) SUBJECT TO COMMISSION APPROVAL, AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC
COMPANY MAY CHOOSE TO RECOVER ITS PRUDENTLY INCURRED AND VERIFIABLE
COSTS THROUGH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE.
(D) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY REQUIRED OR AUTHORIZED
TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OWN, OR LEASE AND OPERATE ITS OWN GENERATING
FACILITIES UNDER § 7–510 OF THIS TITLE MAY RECOVER ITS PRUDENTLY INCURRED
AND VERIFIED COSTS AT AN ANNUAL RATE OF RETURN THAT IS NOT LESS THAN THE
RATE OF RETURN ON ITS TRANSMISSION RATE BASE AS APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL
ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION FOR THAT CALENDAR YEAR.
(E) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY THAT IS A MEMBER OF A
REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION THAT OPERATES A WHOLESALE MARKET
MAY:
(1) OPERATE A GENERATING FACILITY AND PARTICIPATE IN THE
WHOLESALE MARKET OF THAT REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION; AND
(2) APPLY ANY NET REVENUES FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE
WHOLESALE MARKET OF THAT REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION AGAINST
THE OPERATING COSTS OF THE GENERATING FACILITY.
7–510.
(c) [(6) In order to meet long–term, anticipated demand in the State for
standard offer service and other electricity supply, the Commission may require or allow
an investor–owned electric company to construct, acquire, or lease, and operate, its own
generating facilities, and transmission facilities necessary to interconnect the generating
facilities with the electric grid, subject to appropriate cost recovery.]
(6) (I) 1. IN THIS PARAGRAPH THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE
THE MEANINGS INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 954 5
2. “PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY” MEANS A
NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED STATISTICAL RATING ORGANIZATION, AS APPROVED BY
THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION UNDER THE
FEDERAL CREDIT RATING AGENCY REFORM ACT OF 2006 OR SUBSEQUENT
LEGISLATION, THAT IS IN THE TOP TWO NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED STATISTICAL
RATING ORGANIZATIONS IN TERMS OF MARKET SHARE.
3. “RATING ASSESSMENT” MEANS A WRITTEN ANALYSIS
PROVIDED BY A PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY THAT INCLUDES:
A. A REVIEW OF A COMMISSION ORDER OR ORDERS TO
REQUIRE OR ALLOW AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY TO CONSTRUCT,
ACQUIRE, OWN, OR LEASE AND OPERATE A GENERATING FACILITY; AND
B. A DETERMINATION OF THE LIKELY IMPACT OF THE
COMMISSION ORDER ON THE CREDITWORTHINESS OF THE INVESTOR–OWNED
ELECTRIC COMPANY AND ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES.
(II) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS
TITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY REQUIRE OR ALLOW AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC
COMPANY TO:
1. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OWN, OR LEASE AND OPERATE
GENERATING FACILITIES; AND
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OWN, OR LEASE AND OPERATE
TRANSMISSION FACILITIES NECESSARY TO INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING
FACILITIES WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(III) A COMMISSION ORDER REQUIRING OR ALLOWING AN
INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OWN, OR LEASE
AND OPERATE A GENERATING FACILITY WITH A NAMEPLATE CAPACITY THAT
EXCEEDS 2 MEGAWATTS MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL:
1. THE INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY:
A. IDENTIFIES A PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY;
B. PROVIDES A COPY OF THE COMMISSION ORDER,
ALONG WITH ANY TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND CONTINGENCIES TO THE CREDIT
RATING AGENCY; AND

SENATE BILL 954
C. REQUESTS A RATING ASSESSMENT OF THE
COMMISSION ORDER FROM THE PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY; AND
2. THE PREMIER CREDIT RATING AGENCY ISSUES A
RATING ASSESSMENT THAT FINDS THAT THE TERMS OF THE COMMISSION ORDER
ARE NOT LIKELY TO BE CREDIT NEGATIVE FOR THE INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC
COMPANY AND ITS AFFILIATES.
(IV) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION
SHALL PROPOSE REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(s) “Tier 1 renewable source” means one or more of the following types of energy
sources:
(1) solar energy, including energy from photovoltaic technologies and solar
water heating systems;
(2) wind;
(3) qualifying biomass;
(4) methane from the anaerobic decomposition of organic materials in a
landfill or wastewater treatment plant;
(5) geothermal, including energy generated through geothermal exchange
from or thermal energy avoided by, groundwater or a shallow ground source;
(6) ocean, including energy from waves, tides, currents, and thermal
differences;
(7) a fuel cell that produces electricity from a Tier 1 renewable source
under item (3) or (4) of this subsection;
(8) a small hydroelectric power plant of less than 30 megawatts in capacity
that is licensed or exempt from licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(9) poultry litter–to–energy;
(10) thermal energy from a thermal biomass system; and

SENATE BILL 954 7
(11) raw or treated wastewater used as a heat source or sink for a heating
or cooling system.
(t) “Tier 2 renewable source” means hydroelectric power other than pump storage
generation.
7–1201.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Effective load carrying capability” or “ELCC” means the expected capacity
contribution of an energy resource during PJM Interconnection’s operating hours when
there is high electricity demand and low resource output.
7–1226.
(a) In selecting a proposal for a front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage
device project, the Commission:
(1) shall specify:
(i) 1. a 15–year pricing schedule that uses a monthly fixed price
for each megawatt that represents the anticipated wholesale value of capacity for the
front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage device and the benefits identified in §
7–1225(a)(2) of this subtitle; OR
2. A PRICING SCHEDULE THAT USES A MONTHLY FIXED
PRICE THAT REPRESENTS:
A. THE COST TO CONSTRUCT AND OPERATE THE
FRONT–OF–THE–METER TRANSMISSION ENERGY STORAGE DEVICE; AND
B. THE BENEFITS IDENTIFIED FROM THE COST–BENEFIT
ANALYSIS UNDER § 7–1225(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(ii) THAT ANY WHOLESALE MARKET REVENUE RECEIVED BY
THE ENERGY STORAGE PROJECT SHALL BE:
1. OFFSET BY THE PRICING SCHEDULE APPROVED BY
THE COMMISSION; AND
2. TRANSMITTED TO THE COMMISSION TO BE HELD IN
ESCROW FOR DISTRIBUTION TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR
CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER;

SENATE BILL 954
(III) that each electricity supplier shall be responsible for purchasing
storage capacity credits at the monthly fixed price schedule proportional to the electricity
supplier’s capacity obligation;
[(iii)] (IV) that all PJM capacity market revenue earned by the
energy storage project be transmitted to the Commission to be held in escrow for
distribution to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer
proportional to the electricity supplier’s monthly capacity purchase obligation;
[(iv)] (V) that the energy storage project shall retain any energy and
ancillary services revenue earned;
[(v)] (VI) that electric companies must jointly select an escrow
administrator, in consultation with the Commission; and
[(vi)] (VII) for any cost recovery by an electric company, that the
recovery shall be done through a nonbypassable surcharge established by the electric
company that is added to the electric company’s base distribution rate or supply rate on
customer bills;
(2) shall specify that for continued receipt of payment under item (1) of this
subsection, an applicant shall demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the Commission, that the
applicant’s energy storage device is available AND IS PARTICIPATING IN THE PJM
CAPACITY MARKET AT ITS FULL CAPABILITY TO REASONABLY MAXIMIZE THE
PROJECT’S MARKET REVENUES;
(3) shall incorporate penalties for nonperformance and underperformance
in the contract, including withholding of payment that reflects the degree of
underperformance, for energy storage devices that fail to meet availability metrics;
(4) may terminate energy storage devices from the program if device
performance does not improve after appropriate notice and opportunity to cure;
(5) shall consider other nonprice factors to ensure project deliverability
within 24 months after the award date, such as:
(i) project maturity dates;
(ii) interconnection queue status;
(iii) site control;
(iv) developer experience, including procuring, constructing, and
operating front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage devices;

SENATE BILL 954 9
(v) any evidence of key development milestones to substantiate
project deliverability within 24 months after the award date;
(vi) safety plans; and
(vii) any other relevant nonprice factors as determined by the
Commission; and
(6) shall require, at a minimum, all energy storage devices that utilize
lithium–ion batteries to comply with the most up–to–date revision of the National Fire
Protection Association 855: Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy Storage
Systems in effect at the project’s final permit application date.
(b) (1) Each energy storage project shall include a proposed decommissioning
plan.
(2) The proposed decommissioning plan shall include a plan to maximize
the recycling or reuse of all qualifying components of each energy storage device.
(3) The owner or operator of an energy storage device may submit a revised
recycling and reuse plan that incorporates emerging recycling and reuse opportunities up
to 1 year before executing the decommissioning plan.
(c) The Commission shall:
(1) after giving public notice, hold one or more public hearings to receive
public comment and evaluate the proposals; and
(2) subject to subsection (d) of this section, issue one or more orders to
select a proposal or proposals for development.
(d) The Commission may end the solicitation process without selecting a proposal
if the Commission finds that none of the proposals adequately support the goals established
under this subtitle, including the goal of securing affordable, reliable electrical service for
Maryland residents.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.